FST/ckt/chukchi.foma
### Chukchi.foma ###

# Define Alphabets
define Alphabet [ А | Б | В | Г | Д | Е | Ё | Ж | З | И | Й | К | Ӄ | Л | Ԓ | М | Н | Ӈ | О | П | Р | С | Т | У | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ | Ъ | Ы | Ь | Э | Ю | Я   
                | а | б | в | г | д | e | ё | ж | з | и | й | к | ӄ | л | ԓ | м | н | ӈ | о | п | р | с | т | у | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | ъ | ы | ь | э | ю | я | ʼ ]; 

# Define Vowels
define Vow [ А | Е | Ё | И | О | У | Ы | Э | Ю | Я | %{Æ%}| 
             а | е | ё | и | о | у | ы | э | ю | я ];
        

# Define dominant vowels
define Vd [ А | О | Я | Ё | 
            а | о | я | ё ];

# Define recessive vowels
define Vr [ и | у | э | i | u | e ]; 

# Define Yots 
define Yot [ Е | е | Ё | ё | Ю | ю | Я | я ];

# Define Consonants 
define Cns [ Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Ӄ | Л | Ԓ | М | Н | Ӈ | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ 
             б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | ӄ | л | ԓ | м | н | ӈ | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ];  

# Define Coronals
define Coronal [ т | н | й | ч | р | ԓ | 
                 Т | Н | Й | Ч | Р | Ԓ ];

# Define Glottals
define Glottal [ ʼ | Ъ | Ь | ъ | ь ];

# Define Nasals
define Nasal [ М | Н | Ӈ | 
               м | н | ӈ ];
				   
# Define Anteriors
define Anterior [ П | Т | С | Ч | М | Н | В |
                  п | т | с | ч | м | н | в ];
				         
# Define Alveolars 
define Alveolar [ Т | Н | Р | С | Ч | Ԓ | Л | 
                  т | н | р | с | ч | ԓ | л ];

# Define Bilabials
define Bilabial [ П | М | В
	          п | м | в ] ;

# Define Backs	
define Back [ К | Ӄ | Ӈ | Г |
              к | ӄ | ӈ | г ];

read lexc morph_ckt.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Define ӈ deletion
#define ӈDel ӈ [ Cns | Vow ] -> 0 | _ "^" k;

# Define H deletion
define HDel ӈ Vow -> k || _ "^" t;
            #н Vow -> 0 | _ "^" k ,,
            #н Cns Cns -> 0 | _ "^" k ,,
	    #н Vow Vow ] -> 0 | _ "^" k;
            #ӈ Cns -> 0 | _ "^" [ k | й п ы | т ] ,,
	    #ӈ Vow -> 0 | _ "^" [ k | й п ы | т ] ,,
	    #ӈ Cns Cns -> 0 | _ "^" [ k | й п ы | т ] ,,
	    #ӈ Vow Vow -> 0 | _ "^" [ k | й п ы | т ] ,,
            #Vow н -> 0 | _ "^" [ k | й п ы | т | о ] ,,
	    #Vow ӈ -> 0 | _ "^" [ k | й п ы | т | о ];

define HDelete н -> 0 || _ "^" [ т | к | й п ы ];

#define HDelt н -> 0 || а н "^" k;	       

define VHdeletion Vow н -> 0 || _ "^" о ,,
                  Vow н -> 0 || _ "^" э;

define Muldel ы т у м -> 0 || _ "^" э;

#define Multdel н у т .#. -> 0 || "^" k;

# Define я alternation
define Alternation я -> а || _ "^" т;

#Define ABL case alternation
define AblativeSg й п ы -> г ы п ы || м "^" _;	

#Define Dative singular case
define datSg н у т э н у т -> н о т а || _ "^" г т ы ,,
             и ԓ и р -> э ԓ е р э т ы || _ "^" г т ы;	 

define datdel ԓ г ы н -> 0 || _ "^" г т ы;

define datsufdel г т ы -> 0 || э ԓ е р э т ы "^" _;

#Define Essive case
define Essive t -> 0 || k "^" t;

#Define Vowel Insertion
define Vinsert [..] -> ы || п _ "^" к;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;


read lexc morph_ckt.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon       .o.
               HDel          .o.
    	       Essive        .o.
	       HDelete       .o.
	       Alternation   .o.
	       VHdeletion    .o.
	       Muldel        .o.
	       HConsDel      .o.
	       Vinsert       .o.
#	       Multdel       .o.
	       AblativeSg    .o.
	       datSg         .o.
	       datdel        .o.
	       datsufdel     .o.
	       Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
